Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.530

Technical correction. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Technical correction" means the correction of a minor or ministerial error in a required report that does not materially harm the public interest and needs to be corrected for the report to be in full compliance with the requirements of this title.

[ 2024 c 164 s 253.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.